zh-TW: 縫襯布標: 包包外部; 包包內部; 下襬; 內部口袋; 頸部/衣領; 外部/品牌標籤; 被角/邊緣; 側縫; 褲頭/腰帶; 其他
da: Placering af påsyet label: Taskens ydre; Taskens indre; Søm; Indvendig lomme; Nakke/krave; Udvendig/brandfane; Quilthjørne/-kant; Sidesøm; Linning; Andet
vi: Vị trí may nhãn: Bên ngoài túi; Bên trong túi; Gấu; Túi trong; Cổ/cổ áo; Bên ngoài/thẻ thương hiệu; Góc/mép chăn; Đường may sườn; Cạp; Khác
ko: 봉제 라벨 배치: 가방 외부; 가방 내부; 밑단; 내부 포켓; 목/칼라; 외부/브랜드 탭; 퀼트 모서리/가장자리; 측면 솔기; 허리 밴드; 기타
sl-SI: Namestitev etikete za šivanje: Zunanjost torbe; Notranjost torbe; Zarobljen rob; Notranji žep; Vrat/ovratnik; Zunanjost/zavihek z blagovno znamko; Kot/rob odeje; Stranski šiv; Pas; Drugo
en: Sew-in label placement: Bag exterior; Bag interior; Hem; Inside pocket; Neck/collar; Outside/brand tab; Quilt corner/edge; Side seam; Waistband; Other
nb: Plassering for innsydd etikett: Veske utside; Veske innside; Fald; Innvendig lomme; Nakke/krage; Utside/merkefane; Quilt-hjørne/-kant; Sidesøm; Linning; Annet
hu: Bevarrható címke elhelyezése: Táska külseje; Táska belseje; Szegély; Belső zseb; Nyak / Gallér; Kívül / Márkajelzés; Paplan sarka / Szegélye; Oldalvarrás; Derékpánt; Egyéb
de: Platzierung des Einnählabels: Taschenaußenseite; Tascheninnenseite; Saum; Innentasche; Nacken/Kragen; Außen/Marken-Etikett; Quilt-Ecke/-Kante; Seitennaht; Bund; Andere
nl: Innaaibaar label plaatsing: Buitenkant tas; Binnenkant tas; Zoom; Binnenzak; Hals/kraag; Buitenkant/merktab; Quilt-hoek/-rand; Zijnaad; Tailleband; Overig
zh-CN: 缝入式标签位置: 包袋外部; 包袋内部; 下摆; 内部口袋; 领口/衣领; 外部/品牌标签; 绗缝被角/边缘; 侧缝; 裤腰; 其他
el: Τοποθέτηση ραφτής ετικέτας: Εξωτερικό τσάντας; Εσωτερικό τσάντας; Στρίφωμα; Εσωτερική τσέπη; Λαιμόκοψη/γιακάς; Εξωτερικό/ετικέτα επωνυμίας; Γωνία/άκρη παπλώματος; Πλαϊνή ραφή; Ζώνη μέσης; Άλλο
es: Ubicación de la etiqueta cosida: Exterior del bolso; Interior del bolso; Dobladillo; Bolsillo interior; Cuello; Exterior/etiqueta de la marca; Esquina/borde del edredón; Costura lateral; Pretina; Otro
fr: Emplacement de l’étiquette à coudre: Extérieur du sac; Intérieur du sac; Ourlet; Poche intérieure; Cou/col; Extérieur/étiquette de la marque; Coin/bord de couette; Couture latérale; Ceinture; Autre
pt-BR: Etiqueta costurável posicionamento: Exterior da bolsa; Interior da bolsa; Bainha; Bolso interno; Gola/colarinho; Exterior/etiqueta da marca; Canto/borda da colcha; Costura lateral; Cós; Outro
it: Posizionamento dell'etichetta da cucire: Esterno della borsa; Interno della borsa; Orlo; Tasca interna; Collo/Colletto; Esterno/Etichetta del brand; Angolo/Bordo della trapunta; Cucitura laterale; Girovita; Altro
th: Sew-in Label ส่วนใหญ่วาง: ด้านนอกกระเป๋า; ด้านในกระเป๋า; ชายเสื้อ; กระเป๋าด้านใน; คอ/ปกเสื้อ; ด้านนอก/ป้ายแบรนด์; มุม/ขอบผ้านวม; ตะเข็บข้าง; ขอบเอว; อื่นๆ
ru: Место вшивания ярлыка: Снаружи сумки; Внутри сумки; Подол; Внутренний карман; Горловина/воротник; Снаружи/фирменный ярлык; Угол/край одеяла; Боковой шов; Пояс; Другое
pt-PT: Localização da etiqueta para costura: Exterior do saco; Interior do saco; Bainha; Bolso interior; Decote/colarinho; Exterior/etiqueta da marca; Canto/bordo de edredão; Costura lateral; Cós; Outro
ja: 縫い付けラベル配置: バッグ外側; バッグ内側; 裾; 内ポケット; ネック/襟; 外側/ブランドタブ; キルトコーナー/エッジ; 脇縫い目 (サイドシーム); ウエストバンド; その他
cs: Umístění nášivky: Vně tašky; Uvnitř tašky; Lem; Vnitřní kapsa; Za krk / límeček; Vně / štítek se značkou; Roh/okraj deky; Boční šev; Pásek v pase; Jiné
tr: Dikilebilir etiket yerleşimi: Çanta dışı; Çanta içi; Etek ucu; İç cep; Boyun/yaka; Dış kısım/marka etiketi; Yorgan köşesi/kenarı; Yan dikiş; Bel bandı; Diğer
ro-RO: Amplasare a etichetei cusute: Exterior geantă; Interior geantă; Tiv; Buzunar interior; Guler/gât; Exterior/etichetă de brand; Colț/margine pilotă; Cusătură laterală; Betelie; Altele
hr-HR: Položaj ušivene etikete: Vanjština torbe; Unutrašnjost torbe; Porub; Unutarnji džep; Vrat/ovratnik; Vanjština / oznaka robne marke; Kut / rub popluna; Bočni šav; Pojas; Ostalo
fi: Ommeltavan merkin paikka: Laukun ulkopuoli; Laukun sisäpuoli; Helma; Sisätasku; Niska/kaulus; Ulkopuoli/brändimerkki; Peiton kulma/reuna; Sivusauma; Vyötärönauha; Muu
bg-BG: Място на зашиване на етикета.: Външна част на чантата; Вътрешна част на чантата; Подгъв; Вътрешен джоб; Врат/яка; Външна част/етикет на марката; Ъгъл/ръб на юрган; Страничен шев; Колан (талия); Друго
sk-SK: Umiestnenie prišívacej etikety: Vonkajšok tašky; Vnútro tašky; Lem; Vnútorné vrecko; Krk/golier; Vonkajšok / značkový štítok; Roh/okraj deky; Bočný šev; Pás; Iné
sv: Placering av insydd etikett: Väskans utsida; Väskans insida; Fåll; Innerficka; Hals/krage; Utsida/varumärkesflik; Täckets hörn/kant; Sidsöm; Midjeband; Övrigt
lt-LT: Įsiuvamos etiketės vieta: Krepšio išorė; Krepšio vidus; Atlenkimas; Vidinė kišenė; Kaklas / apykaklė; Išorė / prekių ženklo etiketė; Antklodės kampas / kraštas; Šoninė siūlė; Juosmuo; Kita
pl: Umiejscowienie wszywki: Na zewnątrz torby; Wewnątrz torby; Rąbek; Wewnętrzna kieszeń; Kark/kołnierz; Na zewnątrz / etykieta marki; Róg/brzeg kołdry; Boczny szew; Pas; Inne